District of Columbia statutes.
29A-241.02

Repealed

Power to hold real or personal estate.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1301, ch. 854, § 703
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(4), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-241.02.
1981 Ed., § 29-702.
1973 Ed., § 29-302.